Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-123.02
Alcoholic liquor wholesale license, except beer; rights of licensee; sampling.

An alcoholic liquor wholesale license, except beer, shall (1) allow the wholesale purchase, importation, and storage of alcoholic liquor and sale of alcoholic liquor, except beer, to licensees in this state and to persons outside the state as may be permitted by law and (2) allow the sampling of tax-paid alcoholic liquor, except beer, upon the premises of the licensed wholesaler by a licensed retailer or allow sampling on the premises of any licensed retailer, whether the license permits consumption on or off the licensed premises, or both, in the manner prescribed by the commission. The sampling authorized under this section shall be limited to persons licensed as wholesalers or retailers and their employees.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 25, p. 390;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-325;

R.S.1943, § 53-123;

Laws 1947, c. 187, § 1(2), p. 617;

Laws 1947, c. 188, § 1(2), p. 621;

Laws 1963, c. 310, § 4, p. 926;

Laws 1980, LB 848, § 3;

Laws 1982, LB 431, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 53, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 205, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 10.